Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.140

Construction.

Nothing in RCW 40.14.060 or 40.14.070 or chapter 42.56 RCW precludes dissemination of criminal history record information, including nonconviction data, for the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 207; 1999 c 326 s 4.]